Washington statutes.
RCW 2.32.360

Compensation of superior court bailiffs.

Bailiffs of the several superior courts in this state, appointed by the respective judges thereof, shall be paid for their services such salary or per diem as shall be fixed and allowed by the board of county commissioners of the county in which they serve.

[ 1949 c 139 s 1; 1945 c 149 s 1; 1943 c 94 s 1; 1939 c 134 s 1; 1917 c 94 s 1; 1891 c 10 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 10973. Cf. 1921 c 25 s 1; 1919 c 141 s 1.]